Indiana, session 2026, HB1335.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-18-2-52.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.188-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 52.5. (a) "Charity care", for purposes of
IC 16-21-6, IC 16-21-9, IC 16-21-9.5, and IC 16-40-6, means the
unreimbursed cost to a hospital of providing, funding, or otherwise
financially supporting health care services:
(1) to a person classified by the hospital as financially indigent or
medically indigent on an inpatient or outpatient basis; and
(2) to financially indigent patients through other nonprofit or
public outpatient clinics, hospitals, or health care organizations.
(b) As used in this section, "financially indigent" means an
uninsured or underinsured person who is accepted for care with no
obligation or a discounted obligation to pay for the services rendered
based on the hospital's financial criteria and procedure used to
determine if a patient is eligible for charity care. The criteria and
procedure must include income levels and means testing indexed to the
federal poverty guidelines. A hospital may determine that a person is
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


financially or medically indigent under the hospital's eligibility system
after health care services are provided.
(c) As used in this section, "medically indigent" means a person
whose medical or hospital bills after payment by third party payors
exceed a specified percentage of the patient's annual gross income as
determined in accordance with the hospital's eligibility system, and
who is financially unable to pay the remaining bill.
SECTION 2. IC 16-18-2-56.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 56.4. "Clinical department", for
purposes of IC 16-21-9, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-21-9-0.5.
SECTION 3. IC 16-18-2-251 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 251. "Nonprofit
hospital", for purposes of IC 16-21-9 and IC 16-21-9.5, has the
meaning set forth in IC 16-21-9-3.
SECTION 4. IC 16-18-2-272.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 272.6. "Payment assistance
program", for purposes of IC 16-21-9.5, has the meaning set forth
in IC 16-21-9.5-1.
SECTION 5. IC 16-18-2-288.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 288.5. "Preceptor", for purposes
of IC 16-21-9, has the meaning set forth in IC 16-21-9-3.4.
SECTION 6. IC 16-21-9-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. As used in this chapter, "clinical department"
means a department of a nonprofit hospital that provides direct
patient care services.
SECTION 7. IC 16-21-9-3.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3.4. As used in this chapter, "preceptor" means a
licensed clinician who provides supervised clinical training to
students enrolled in any of the following accredited programs:
(1) Medical.
(2) Nursing.
(3) Allied health.
(4) Behavioral health.
(5) A program related to a program described in subdivisions
(1) through (4).
SECTION 8. IC 16-21-9-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A nonprofit
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


hospital shall develop:
(1) an organizational mission statement that identifies the
hospital's commitment to serving the health care needs of the
community; and
(2) a community benefits plan defined as an operational plan for
serving the community's health care needs that:
(A) sets out goals and objectives for providing community
benefits that include charity care and government sponsored
indigent health care; and
(B) identifies the populations and communities served by the
hospital; and
(C) includes a preceptor as set forth in subsection (b).
A nonprofit hospital shall spend more on the nonprofit hospital's
community benefits plan than on the nonprofit hospital's estimated
value of tax exemptions, as calculated under section 7(a)(8) of this
chapter.
(b) A nonprofit hospital shall maintain at least one (1) preceptor
in at least sixty percent (60%) of the nonprofit hospital's clinical
departments during each reporting year as part of the nonprofit
hospital's community benefits plan requirement. A nonprofit
hospital may satisfy this requirement through a combination of any
of the following:
(1) Employed clinicians.
(2) Contracted clinicians.
(3) Shared preceptors participating in regional training
partnerships.
(c) A nonprofit hospital may count preceptor activities as
community benefits expenditures for reporting purposes under this
chapter. Qualifying expenditures for the operation of a preceptor
include the following:
(1) Salaries.
(2) Stipends.
(3) Administrative support.
(4) Training coordination.
(5) Other costs associated with clinical instruction.
(d) The state department shall verify compliance with this
section and the reporting requirements under section 7 of this
chapter. If the state department determines that a nonprofit
hospital is not complying with this section, the state department
may require the nonprofit hospital to submit a corrective action
plan to the state department. If a nonprofit hospital continues to
violate this section, the state department may take action under
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


section 8 of this chapter.
SECTION 9. IC 16-21-9-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.6-2012,
SECTION 115, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Each nonprofit hospital shall
prepare an annual report of the community benefits plan. The report
must include, in addition to the community benefits plan itself, the
following background information:
(1) The hospital's mission statement.
(2) A disclosure of the health care needs of the community that
were considered in developing the hospital's community benefits
plan.
(3) A disclosure of the amount and types of community benefits
actually provided, including charity care. Charity care must be
reported as a separate item from other community benefits.
(4) Verification of compliance with the preceptor requirement
under section 4(b) of this chapter, including the following
information concerning preceptor activities:
(A) The number of clinical departments.
(B) A list of departments meeting the preceptor
requirement.
(C) Expenditures associated with the operation of a
preceptor.
(5) The nonprofit hospital's expenditure for each of the
following categories of community benefits:
(A) Charity care.
(B) Government sponsored indigent health care.
(C) Donations.
(D) Education, including preceptor activities.
(E) Government sponsored program services.
(F) Research.
(G) Subsidized health services.
(6) The nonprofit hospital's total community benefits
expenditure.
(7) For each expenditure described in subdivision (5), a
description of how the expenditure aligns with at least one (1)
priority specified in the nonprofit hospital's community health
needs assessment filed under 26 U.S.C. 501(r).
(8) An estimate of the financial value of all state and local tax
exemptions under:
(A) IC 6-1.1;
(B) IC 6-2.5; and
(C) IC 6-3;
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


received by the nonprofit hospital during the reporting year.
(9) Measurable outcomes or progress indications related to
the priorities specified in the nonprofit hospital's community
health needs assessment filed under 26 U.S.C. 501(r).
(b) Each nonprofit hospital shall annually file a report of the
community benefits plan with the state department. For a hospital's
fiscal year that ends before July 1, 2011, the report must be filed not
later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the close of the
hospital's fiscal year. For a hospital's fiscal year that ends after June 30,
2011, the report must be filed at the same time the nonprofit hospital
files its annual return described under Section 6033 of the Internal
Revenue Code that is timely filed under Section 6072(e) of the Internal
Revenue Code, including any applicable extension authorized under
Section 6081 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(c) Each nonprofit hospital shall post the report on the nonprofit
hospital's website and prepare a statement that notifies the public that
the annual report of the community benefits plan is:
(1) public information;
(2) filed with the state department; and
(3) available to the public on the nonprofit hospital's website
and that a written copy will be provided to the public by the
nonprofit hospital upon request. from the state department.
This statement shall be posted in prominent places throughout the
hospital, including the emergency room waiting area and the
admissions office waiting area. The statement shall also be printed in
the hospital patient guide or other material that provides the patient
with information about the admissions criteria of the hospital.
(d) Each nonprofit hospital shall develop a written notice about any
charity care program operated by the hospital and how to apply for
charity care. The notice must be in appropriate languages if possible.
The notice must also be conspicuously posted in the following areas:
(1) The general waiting area.
(2) The waiting area for emergency services.
(3) The business office.
(4) Any other area that the hospital considers an appropriate area
in which to provide notice of a charity care program.
(e) The state department, in consultation with the department
of state revenue, shall annually do the following for each nonprofit
hospital:
(1) Review each community benefits plan report submitted by
a nonprofit hospital under this section for accuracy,
completeness, and compliance.
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


(2) Verify compliance with the expenditure alignment
requirement under subsection (a)(7).
(3) Assess whether the nonprofit hospital's community
benefits plan expenditures exceed the tax exemption
information submitted under subsection (a)(8).
(f) The state department shall publish a statewide community
benefits summary report of all of the reports submitted under this
section and post the summary report on the state department's
website.
SECTION 10. IC 16-21-9-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The state
department may assess a civil penalty against a nonprofit hospital that
fails to do the following:
(1) Comply with section 4 of this chapter.
(2) Make a report of the community benefits plan as required
under this chapter.
(3) Otherwise comply with this chapter.
(b) For a violation of subsection (a)(1) or (a)(3), the state
department may take any of the following actions:
(1) Require the nonprofit hospital to submit a corrective
action plan.
(2) Impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation if the nonprofit
hospital:
(A) fails to submit a corrective action plan;
(B) fails to comply with the corrective action plan; or
(C) continuously violates subsection (a)(1) or (a)(3).
A penalty imposed under this subsection shall be deposited in the
state general fund.
(c) For a violation of subsection (a)(2), the penalty may not exceed
one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day a report is delinquent after
the date on which the report is due. No penalty may be assessed against
a hospital under this section subsection until thirty (30) business days
have elapsed after written notification to the hospital of its failure to
file a report.
SECTION 11. IC 16-21-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 9.5. Notice of Payment Assistance Programs
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "payment assistance program"
refers to any of the following:
(1) Charity care.
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


(2) Financial assistance.
(3) Discounted care.
(4) Assistance programs offered as part of a nonprofit
hospital's community benefits plan.
Sec. 2. (a) A nonprofit hospital shall provide written notice of
the nonprofit hospital's payment assistance program to a patient
or the patient's representative at the following times:
(1) During registration or intake for inpatient or outpatient
services.
(2) At discharge, either in a written format or electronically
through a patient portal system.
(3) With the initial billing statement for the provided services.
(b) The written notice required under subsection (a) must
include the following:
(1) A description of available payment assistance programs.
(2) Eligibility criteria.
(3) Application instructions.
(4) Contact information for a hospital representative when
assistance is needed to complete the application.
Sec. 3. A nonprofit hospital shall post conspicuous signage
notifying patients of the availability of payment assistance
programs in the following locations:
(1) Inpatient and outpatient registration areas.
(2) Financial counseling offices.
(3) Emergency departments.
The signs must be printed in at least the five (5) most used
languages spoken in the county based on the most recent United
States Census Bureau American Community Survey.
Sec. 4. A nonprofit hospital shall make payment assistance
program information available electronically through any patient
portal maintained by the nonprofit hospital.
Sec. 5. Before beginning a collection action, a nonprofit hospital
shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether the patient is eligible for a payment
assistance program.
(2) Make a reasonable effort to notify the patient of available
payment assistance programs and provide the patient with an
application form.
Sec. 6. A nonprofit hospital shall annually report compliance
with this chapter as part of the nonprofit hospital's community
benefits plan report under IC 16-21-9-7.
Sec. 7. The state department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104


to administer and enforce this chapter.
Sec. 8. The state department may assess a nonprofit hospital a
civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
violation for failure to comply with this chapter. A penalty
collected under this section shall be deposited in the state general
fund.
2026 IN 1335—LS 7015/DI 104